Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.160

Promotional plans—Purpose—Authority of commission—Limitation on liability.

To maintain and complement the existing comprehensive regulatory scheme, the commission may employ, designate as agent, act in concert with, and enter into contracts with any person, council, or commission, including but not limited to the director, state agencies such as the Washington state fruit commission and its successors, statewide horticultural associations, organizations or associations engaged in tracking the movement and marketing of horticultural products, and organizations or associations of horticultural growers, for the purpose of promoting the general welfare of the apple industry and particularly for the purpose of assisting in the sale and distribution of apples in domestic or foreign commerce, and expend its funds or such portion thereof as it may deem necessary or advisable for such purpose and for the purpose of paying its proportionate share of the cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale and distribution of apples in domestic or foreign commerce. For such purposes it may employ and pay for legal counsel and contract and pay for other professional services. The liability of the state for the acts of the commission, or upon its contracts, shall be limited solely to the assets of the commission. In any civil or criminal action or proceeding for violation of any statute, including a rule adopted under that statute, or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade, including any action under chapter 19.86 RCW, proof that the act complained of was done in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, and in furtherance of the purposes and provisions of this chapter, is a complete defense to such an action or proceeding.

[ 2004 c 178 s 13; 2002 c 313 s 126; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.160. Prior: 1947 c 280 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.